California, session 20252026, SB8.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4850 of the Labor Code is amended to read:4850. (a) Whenever any person listed in subdivision (b), who is employed on a regular, full-time basis, and is disabled, whether temporarily or permanently, by injury or illness arising out of and in the course of the person’s duties, the person shall become entitled, regardless of the person’s period of service with the city, county, or district, to a leave of absence while so disabled without loss of salary in lieu of temporary disability payments or maintenance allowance payments, if any, that would be payable under this chapter, for the period of the disability, but not exceeding one year, or until that earlier date as the person is retired on permanent disability pension, and is actually receiving disability pension payments, or advanced disability pension payments pursuant to Section 4850.3.(b) The persons eligible under subdivision (a) include all of the following:(1) City police officers.(2) City, county, or district firefighters.(3) Sheriffs.(4) Officers or employees of any sheriff’s offices.(5) Inspectors, investigators, detectives, or personnel with comparable titles in any district attorney’s office.(6) County probation officers, group counselors, or juvenile services officers.(7) Officers or employees of a probation office.(8) Peace officers under Section 830.31 of the Penal Code employed on a regular, full-time basis by a county of the first class.(9) Lifeguards employed year round on a regular, full-time basis by a county of the first class or by the City of San Diego.(10) Airport law enforcement officers under subdivision (d) of Section 830.33 of the Penal Code.(11) Harbor or port police officers, wardens, or special officers of a harbor or port district or city or county harbor department under subdivision (a) of Section 830.1 or subdivision (b) of Section 830.33 of the Penal Code.(12) Police officers of the Los Angeles Unified School District.(13) Peace officers, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 830.31 of the Penal Code, who are employed on a regular, full-time basis by a county of the eighth class as defined by Sections 28020 and 28029 of the Government Code.(c) This section shall apply only to persons listed in subdivision (b) who meet the requirements of subdivision (a), and shall not include any of the following:(1) Employees of a police department whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly fall within the scope of active law enforcement service.(2) Employees of a county sheriff’s office whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly come within the scope of active law enforcement service.(3) Employees of a county probation office whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly come within the scope of active law enforcement service.(4) Employees of a city fire department, county fire department, or fire district whose principal duties are those of a telephone operator, clerk, stenographer, machinist, mechanic, or otherwise, and whose functions do not clearly fall within the scope of active firefighting and prevention service.(d) If the employer is insured, the payments that, except for this section, the insurer would be obligated to make as disability indemnity to the injured, the insurer may pay to the insured.(e) No leave of absence taken pursuant to this section by a peace officer, as defined by Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or by a city, county, or district firefighter, shall be deemed to constitute family care and medical leave, as defined in Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, or to reduce the time authorized for family care and medical leave by Section 12945.2 of the Government Code.(f) This section shall not apply to any persons described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) who are employees of the City and County of San Francisco.(g) Amendments to subdivision (f) made by the act adding this subdivision shall be applied retroactively to January 1, 2010.